Wyoming, session 2025, SF0088.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Board" means the Wyoming wildlife and
natural resource trust account board created by W.S.
9-15-104;
(ii) "Income account" means the Wyoming wildlife
and natural resource trust income account created by W.S.
9-15-103(b).
(b) Pursuant to the authority granted under W.S.
9-15-104(k) and subject to each recipient's certification
under W.S. 9-15-103(r), authorization is granted for
funding of the large projects provided for in subsections
(c) through (n) of this section.
(c) Thunder Basin Habitat III:
(i) Project sponsor: Wyoming Game and Fish
Commission;
(ii) Project purpose: Restoration of native
ecosystems through vegetation management, riparian
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
restoration, fence modification and invasive species
control on approximately forty-eight thousand eight hundred
fifty (48,850) acres in northeast Wyoming in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk, antelope and other species;
(B) Maintain primary migration corridors
for native ungulates;
(C) Maintain Core Population Areas for
Greater Sage-grouse and other sagebrush obligate species;
(D) Conserve valuable grassland and
intermediate shrubland ecotypes.
(iii) Project description: Rangeland
restoration;
(iv) Total project budget: Four million
seventeen thousand three hundred forty dollars
($4,017,340.00);
(v) Project grant: The total grant for the
project, including all grants previously awarded for the
project and the additional six hundred twenty thousand
dollar ($620,000.00) grant authorized under this
subsection, shall be nine hundred three thousand dollars
($903,000.00);
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board six hundred twenty thousand
dollars ($620,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to
carry out the purposes of this subsection. Unexpended and
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
unobligated funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to the income account on June 30, 2029.
(d) Baggs Valley Headwaters III:
(i) Project sponsor: Little Snake River
Conservation District;
(ii) Project purpose: Restoration of native
vegetation through mechanical, chemical and prescribed fire
across a varied landscape of approximately five thousand
three hundred (5,300) acres in Carbon county in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk, moose, antelope and other species;
(B) Maintain primary migration corridors for
native ungulates;
(C) Maintain Core Population Areas for
Greater Sage-grouse and other sagebrush obligate species;
(D) Conserve valuable grassland and
intermediate shrubland ecotypes.
(iii) Project description: Rangeland
restoration;
(iv) Total project budget: Five million two
hundred six thousand five hundred dollars ($5,206,500.00);
(v) Project grant: The board is authorized to
grant seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000.00) to
the sponsor for the purposes specified in this subsection;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($750,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
Unexpended and unobligated funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to the income account on June 30,
2029.
(e) Kemmerer Highway 189 Migration:
(i) Project sponsor: Wyoming Department of
Transportation;
(ii) Project purpose: Fence construction,
roadway replacement and overpass and underpass construction
on thirty (30) miles of extremely high wildlife and vehicle
use roadway south of Kemmerer in Lincoln and Uinta counties
in order to:
(A) Allow for the safe movement of
antelope, elk and deer across a major highway to increase
connectivity and maintain populations for a variety of
wildlife;
(B) Reduce and eliminate the potential for
catastrophic collisions that impact human life, wildlife
and property damage.
(iii) Project description: Highway crossing
construction;
(iv) Total project budget: Thirty-one million
one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred sixty-two
dollars ($31,183,162.00);
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(v) Project grant: The board is authorized to
grant to the sponsor six million two hundred nine thousand
eight hundred thirty-eight dollars ($6,209,838.00) for the
purposes specified in this subsection;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board six million two hundred
nine thousand eight hundred thirty-eight dollars
($6,209,838.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purposes of this subsection. Unexpended and
unobligated funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to the income account on June 30, 2029.
(f) Wind River Front Cheatgrass:
(i) Project sponsor: Fremont County Weed and
Pest District;
(ii) Project purpose: Removal of invasive
grasses on approximately forty-eight thousand (48,000)
acres in Fremont county in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk, moose, antelope and bighorn sheep;
(B) Maintain Core Population Areas for
Greater Sage-grouse and other sagebrush obligate species;
(C) Conserve valuable grassland and
intermediate shrubland ecotypes;
(D) Maintain agricultural production and
opportunity on high-quality ranch lands.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iii) Project description: Invasive species
management;
(iv) Total project budget: Three million five
hundred thirty-four thousand eight hundred ninety dollars
($3,534,890.00);
(v) Project grant: The board is authorized to
grant eight hundred eighty-three thousand seven hundred
twenty dollars ($883,720.00) to the sponsor for the
purposes specified in this subsection;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board eight hundred eighty-three
thousand seven hundred twenty dollars ($883,720.00) or as
much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purposes of
this subsection. Unexpended and unobligated funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to the
income account on June 30, 2029.
(g) Seminoe Shirley Habitat II:
(i) Project sponsor: Wyoming Game and Fish
Commission;
(ii) Project purpose: Restoration of native
ecosystems through vegetation management, riparian
restoration, fence modification and invasive species
control on approximately one hundred thousand (100,000)
acres in central Wyoming in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk, antelope and other species;
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(B) Maintain primary migration corridors
for native ungulates;
(C) Maintain Core Population Areas for
Greater Sage-grouse and other sagebrush obligate species;
(D) Conserve valuable grassland and
intermediate shrubland ecotypes;
(E) Maintain seasonal movement
opportunities for native fish.
(iii) Project description: Rangeland
restoration;
(iv) Total project budget: Five million nine
hundred twenty-four thousand dollars ($5,924,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The board is authorized to
grant to the sponsor three hundred seventy-two thousand
dollars ($372,000.00) for the purposes specified in this
subsection;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board three hundred seventy-two
thousand dollars ($372,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
Unexpended and unobligated funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to the income account on June 30,
2029.
(h) NEWIGWG Cheatgrass:
(i) Project sponsor: Sheridan County Weed and
Pest District;
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) Project purpose: Removal of invasive
grasses on approximately seventy-eight thousand three
hundred sixty (78,360) acres in Sheridan, Johnson, Campbell
and Crook counties in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk and antelope;
(B) Maintain Core Population Areas for
Greater Sage-grouse and other sagebrush obligate species;
(C) Conserve valuable grassland and
intermediate shrubland ecotypes;
(D) Maintain agricultural production and
opportunity on high-quality ranch lands.
(iii) Project description: Invasive species
management;
(iv) Total project budget: Twenty-four million
seven hundred thirty thousand six hundred seven dollars
($24,730,607.00);
(v) Project grant: The board is authorized to
grant four million five hundred thousand dollars
($4,500,000.00) to the sponsor for the purposes specified
in this subsection;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board four million five hundred
thousand dollars ($4,500,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
Unexpended and unobligated funds appropriated under this
8

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
subsection shall revert to the income account on June 30,
2029.
(j) Western Wyoming Cheatgrass:
(i) Project sponsor: Teton County Weed and Pest
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Removal of invasive
grasses on approximately sixty-nine thousand four hundred
sixty-five (69,465) acres in western Wyoming in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk, moose, antelope and bighorn sheep;
(B) Maintain Core Population Areas for
Greater Sage-grouse and other sagebrush obligate species;
(C) Conserve valuable grassland and
intermediate shrubland ecotypes;
(D) Maintain agricultural production and
opportunity on high-quality ranch lands.
(iii) Project description: Invasive species
management;
(iv) Total project budget: Fourteen million six
hundred sixty-five thousand three hundred ninety-two
dollars ($14,665,392.00);
(v) Project grant: The board is authorized to
grant one million four hundred thousand dollars
($1,400,000.00) to the sponsor for the purposes specified
in this subsection;
9

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board one million four hundred
thousand dollars ($1,400,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
Unexpended and unobligated funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to the income account on June 30,
2029.
(k) Upper Green Fence II:
(i) Project sponsor: Sublette County
Conservation District;
(ii) Project purpose: Renovation and replacement
of key stretches of fifty (50) miles of movement barriers
in Sublette County in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk, antelope and other species;
(B) Maintain primary migration corridors
for native ungulates;
(C) Maintain integrity of ranching
operations.
(iii) Project description: Fence modification;
(iv) Total project budget: Two million five
hundred ninety-seven thousand four hundred dollars
($2,597,400.00);
(v) Project grant: The total grant for the
project, including all grants previously awarded for the
10

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
project and the additional two hundred fifty thousand
dollar ($250,000.00) grant authorized under this
subsection, shall be five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000.00);
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to
carry out the purposes of this subsection. Unexpended and
unobligated funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to the income account on June 30, 2029.
(m) Wapiti Habitat Restoration:
(i) Project sponsor: Trout Unlimited;
(ii) Project purpose: Restoration of river
system to allow migration of spawning fish, maintain stream
function and improve adjacent habitats on approximately
four (4) miles of the North Fork of the Shoshone River and
key tributaries in Park county in order to:
(A) Maintain seasonal movement
opportunities for native fish;
(B) Increase the productivity of aquatic
and wetland ecosystems;
(C) Maintain and improve irrigation
efficiency for local agricultural operations;
(D) Eliminate excessive erosion and
maintain water quality;
11

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(E) Maintain uplands to provide habitat for
deer, antelope, Greater Sage-grouse and a variety of
migratory songbirds.
(iii) Project description: River restoration;
(iv) Total project budget: One million eight
hundred thirty-three thousand five hundred eighty-six
dollars ($1,833,586.00);
(v) Project grant: The board is authorized to
grant to the sponsor five hundred fifty thousand dollars
($550,000.00) for the purposes specified in this
subsection;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board five hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($550,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to
carry out the purposes of this subsection. Unexpended and
unobligated funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to the income account on June 30, 2029.
(n) Natrona Core Cheatgrass:
(i) Project sponsor: Wyoming Game and Fish
Commission;
(ii) Project purpose: Removal of invasive
grasses on approximately sixty-nine thousand four hundred
sixty-five (69,465) acres in western Wyoming in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk, antelope and other species;
12

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(B) Maintain Core Population Areas for
Greater Sage-grouse and other sagebrush obligate species;
(C) Conserve valuable grassland and
intermediate shrubland ecotypes;
(D) Maintain agricultural production and
opportunity on high-quality ranch lands.
(iii) Project description: Invasive species
management;
(iv) Total project budget: One million seven
hundred eighty-four thousand five hundred dollars
($1,784,500.00);
(v) Project grant: The board is authorized to
grant eight hundred eighty-four thousand dollars
($884,000.00) to the sponsor for the purposes specified in
this subsection;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board eight hundred eighty-four
thousand dollars ($884,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
Unexpended and unobligated funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to the income account on June 30,
2029.
13

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
14